Illinois, session 104th, SB2102.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 18-50 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/18-50)7    Sec. 18-50. Filing of budget and appropriation ordinance. 8The governing authority of each taxing district shall file 9with the county clerk, either electronically or with a paper 10submission, within 30 days of their adoption a certified copy 11of its appropriation and budget ordinances or resolutions, as 12well as an estimate, certified by its chief fiscal officer, of 13revenues, by source, anticipated to be received by the taxing 14district in the following fiscal year. If the governing 15authority fails to file the required documents, the county 16clerk shall have the authority, after giving timely notice of 17the failure to the taxing district, to refuse to extend the tax 18levy until the documents are so filed.19    If the budget and appropriation ordinance and estimate of 20revenues under this Section is filed electronically, the 21county clerk shall accept and acknowledge that electronic 22filing by providing a receipt to the taxing district. 23    In determining the amount of maximum tax authorized to be   SB2102 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06125 HLH 16158 b1levied by any statute of this State, the assessed valuation of 2the current year of property as assessed and reviewed by the 3local assessment officials or the Department, and as equalized 4or confirmed by the Department, shall be used. 5(Source: P.A. 86-233; 86-953; 86-957; 86-1475; 87-17; 87-477; 687-895; 88-455.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.